Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2041.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 66-1,178 is hereby amended to read as follows: 66-
1,178. (a) No electric utility may begin site preparation for or construction
of an electric transmission line, or exercise the right of eminent domain to
acquire any interest in land in connection with the site preparation for a
construction of any such line without first acquiring a siting permit from
the commission. Whenever any electric utility desires to obtain such a
permit, the utility shall file an application with the commission setting
forth therein that the utility proposes to construct an electric transmission
line and specifying:
(1) The proposed location thereof of such electric transmission line;
(2) the names and addresses of the landowners of record whose land
or interest therein is proposed to be acquired in connection with the
construction of or is located within 660 feet of the center line of the
easement where the line is proposed to be located; and
(3) for transmission lines with costs that will be recovered through a
regional transmission organization, that such line was placed for
competitive bid among qualified bidders with evidence that the bidding
process was open and fair and whether such utility was the lowest
reasonable bid; and
(4) such other information as may be required by the commission.
(b) Upon the filing of an application pursuant to subsection (a), the
commission shall fix a time for a public hearing on such application,
which shall be not more than 90 days after the date the application was
filed, to determine the necessity for and the reasonableness of the location
of the proposed electric transmission line. The commission shall fix the

HB 2041 2
place for hearing, which shall be in one of the counties through which the
electric transmission line is proposed to traverse.
(c) The commission may conduct an evidentiary hearing on an
application filed pursuant to this section at such time and place as the
commission deems appropriate.
(d) The commission shall issue a final order on the application within
120 days after the date the application was filed.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 66-1,180 is hereby amended to read as follows: 66-
1,180. (a) All hearings conducted pursuant to this act shall be in
accordance with the provisions of the Kansas administrative procedure act.
All such hearings shall be completed within 30 days after the
commencement thereof, unless the electric utility requests a continuance
of any such hearing. All costs of any hearing pursuant to this act shall be
taxed against the electric utility.
(b) The commission shall not issue a permit for any electric
transmission line with costs that will be recovered through a regional
transmission organization, unless the commission issues an order that
such line was placed for competitive bid among qualified bidders with
evidence that the bidding process was open and fair and whether the
lowest reasonable bid was selected.
(c) The commission shall make its decision with respect to the
necessity for and the reasonableness of the location of the proposed
electric transmission line, taking into consideration the benefit to both
consumers in Kansas and consumers outside the state and economic
development benefits in Kansas.
(d) The commission shall issue or withhold the permit applied for and
may condition such permit as the commission may deem just and
reasonable and as may, in its judgment, best protect the rights of all
interested parties and those of the general public.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 66-1,178 and 66-1,180 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 4. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.